Utah statutes.
78B-6-111.   Criminal sexual offenses.
A biological father is not entitled to notice of an adoption proceeding, nor
is the consent of a biological father required in connection with an adoption
proceeding, in cases where it is shown that the child who is the subject of
the proceeding was conceived as a result of conduct which would constitute any
sexual offense described in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, regardless of whether
the biological father is formally charged with or convicted of a criminal
offense.
